Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 2. National Criminal History Record Check.

Sec. 12.62.400.
National criminal history record checks for employment, licensing, and other noncriminal justice purposes.

To obtain a national criminal history record check for determining a person’s qualifications for a license, permit, registration, employment, or position, a person shall submit the person’s fingerprints to the department with the fee established by AS

12.62.160

. The department may submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain a national criminal history record check of the person for the purpose of evaluating a person’s qualifications for

a license or conditional contractor’s permit to manufacture, sell, offer for sale, possess for sale or barter, traffic in, or barter an alcoholic beverage under AS 04.11;

licensure as a mortgage lender, a mortgage broker, or a mortgage loan originator under AS 06.60;

admission to the Alaska Bar Association under AS 08.08;

licensure as a collection agency operator under AS 08.24;

a certificate of fitness to handle explosives under AS 08.52;

licensure as a massage therapist under AS 08.61;

licensure to practice nursing or certification as a nurse aide under AS 08.68;

certification as a real estate appraiser under as 08.87;

a position involving supervisory or disciplinary power over a minor or dependent adult for which criminal justice information may be released under AS

12.62.160

(b)(9);

a teacher certificate under AS 14.20;

a registration or license to operate a marijuana establishment under AS 17.38;

admittance to a police training program under AS

18.65.230

or for certification as a police officer under AS

18.65.240

if that person’s prospective employer does not have access to a criminal justice information system;

licensure as a security guard under AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

;

a concealed handgun permit under AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

;

licensure as an insurance producer, managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, surplus lines broker, or independent adjuster under AS 21.27;

serving and executing process issued by a court by a person designated under AS

22.20.130

;

a school bus driver license under AS

28.15.046

;

licensure as an operator or an instructor for a commercial driver training school under AS 28.17;

registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser representative, or investment adviser under AS

45.56.300

—

45.56.350

;

licensure, license renewal, certification, certification renewal, or payment from the Department of Health and Social Services of an individual and an entity subject to the requirements for a criminal history check under AS

47.05.310

, including

a public home care provider described in AS

47.05.017

;

a provider of home and community-based waiver services financed under AS

47.07.030(c)

;

a case manager to coordinate community mental health services under AS

47.30.530

;

an entity listed in AS

47.32.010(b)

, including an owner, officer, director, member, partner, employee, volunteer, or contractor of an entity; or

an individual or entity not described in (A) — (D) of this paragraph that is required by statute or regulation to be licensed or certified by the Department of Health and Social Services or that is eligible to receive payments, in whole or in part, from the Department of Health and Social Services to provide for the health, safety, and welfare of persons who are served by the programs administered by the Department of Health and Social Services.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an applicant for a license under AS 06.60 may submit the applicant’s fingerprints to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In this subsection, “Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry” has the meaning given in 12 U.S.C. 5102.

To obtain a national criminal history record check for determining a current or prospective employee’s qualifications under AS

39.90.210

or a contractor’s qualifications under AS

36.30.960

, the agency or the procurement officer shall submit the current or prospective employee’s or contractor’s fingerprints to the department with the fee established by AS

12.62.160

. The department shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain a national criminal history record check of the current or prospective employee or contractor for the purpose of evaluating a person’s qualifications under AS

36.30.960

and AS

39.90.210

. In this subsection, unless the context otherwise requires,

“agency” has the meaning given in AS

39.90.290

;

“contractor” has the meaning given in AS 36.30.960;

“employee” has the meaning given in AS

39.90.290

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 79 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 105 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 84, 85 ch 61 SLA 2010; am § 8 ch 42 SLA 2014; am § 5 ch 114 SLA 2014; am § 14 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2018; am § 4 ch 65 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

The paragraphs of subsection (a) were renumbered in 2006, 2007, 2014, 2016, and 2018 to maintain the numerical order of the sections cited.

In 2018, in (a) of this section, “AS

45.56.300

—

45.56.350

” was substituted for “AS 45.56.405 —

45.56.440

” to reflect the 2018 renumbering of those sections.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(2), substituted “a mortgage loan originator” for “an originator”; added (b).

The first 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, added (a)(16) [now (a)(8)].

The second 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added (a)(16) [now (a)(6)].

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, added (a)(18) [now (a)(11)], and made a related change.

The first 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added (c).

The second 2018 amendment, effective September 19, 2018, added (a)(19) [now (a)(12)], and made a related change.

The third 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a)(18) [now (a)(19)], substituted “investment adviser under AS 45.56.405 —

45.56.440

[now AS

45.56.300

—

45.56.350

]” for “state investment adviser under AS

45.55.030

–

45.55.060

”.

The fourth 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, added (a)(19) [now (a)(20)].

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 69, SLA 2018 (SB 81), which added paragraph (a)(20), see 2017 Senate Journal 452 — 454.

Sec. 12.62.400.
National criminal history record checks for employment, licensing, and other noncriminal justice purposes.

To obtain a national criminal history record check for determining a person’s qualifications for a license, permit, registration, employment, or position, a person shall submit the person’s fingerprints to the department with the fee established by AS

12.62.160

. The department may submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain a national criminal history record check of the person for the purpose of evaluating a person’s qualifications for

a license or conditional contractor’s permit to manufacture, sell, offer for sale, possess for sale or barter, traffic in, or barter an alcoholic beverage under AS 04.09;

licensure as a mortgage lender, a mortgage broker, or a mortgage loan originator under AS 06.60;

admission to the Alaska Bar Association under AS 08.08;

licensure as a collection agency operator under AS 08.24;

a certificate of fitness to handle explosives under AS 08.52;

licensure as a massage therapist under AS 08.61;

licensure to practice nursing or certification as a nurse aide under AS 08.68;

certification as a real estate appraiser under AS 08.87;

a position involving supervisory or disciplinary power over a minor or dependent adult for which criminal justice information may be released under AS

12.62.160

(b)(9);

a teacher certificate under AS 14.20;

a registration or license to operate a marijuana establishment under AS 17.38;

admittance to a police training program under AS

18.65.230

or for certification as a police officer under AS

18.65.240

if that person’s prospective employer does not have access to a criminal justice information system;

licensure as a security guard under AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

;

a concealed handgun permit under AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

;

licensure as an insurance producer, managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, surplus lines broker, or independent adjuster under AS 21.27;

serving and executing process issued by a court by a person designated under AS

22.20.130

;

a school bus driver license under AS

28.15.046

;

licensure as an operator or an instructor for a commercial driver training school under AS 28.17;

registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser representative, or investment adviser under AS

45.56.300

—

45.56.350

;

licensure, license renewal, certification, certification renewal, or payment from the Department of Health of an individual and an entity subject to the requirements for a criminal history check under AS

47.05.310

, including

a public home care provider described in AS

47.05.017

;

a provider of home and community-based waiver services financed under AS

47.07.030(c)

;

a case manager to coordinate community mental health services under AS

47.30.530

;

an entity listed in AS

47.32.010(b)

and (c), including an owner, officer, director, member, partner, employee, volunteer, or contractor of an entity; or

an individual or entity not described in (A) — (D) of this paragraph that is required by statute or regulation to be licensed or certified by the Department of Health or that is eligible to receive payments, in whole or in part, from the Department of Health to provide for the health, safety, and welfare of persons who are served by the programs administered by the Department of Health;

licensure, license renewal, certification, or certification renewal by the Department of Family and Community Services of an individual or entity, or payment from the Department of Family and Community Services to an individual or entity, subject to the requirements for a criminal history check under AS

47.05.310

for a foster home, child placement agency, and runaway shelter listed in AS

47.32.010(c)

, including an owner, officer, director, member, partner, employee, volunteer, or contractor of an entity.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an applicant for a license under AS 06.60 may submit the applicant’s fingerprints to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In this subsection, “Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry” has the meaning given in 12 U.S.C. 5102.

To obtain a national criminal history record check for determining a current or prospective employee’s qualifications under AS

39.90.210

or a contractor’s qualifications under AS

36.30.960

, the agency or the procurement officer shall submit the current or prospective employee’s or contractor’s fingerprints to the department with the fee established by AS

12.62.160

. The department shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain a national criminal history record check of the current or prospective employee or contractor for the purpose of evaluating a person’s qualifications under AS

36.30.960

and AS

39.90.210

. In this subsection, unless the context otherwise requires,

“agency” has the meaning given in AS

39.90.290

;

“contractor” has the meaning given in AS 36.30.960;

“employee” has the meaning given in AS

39.90.290

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 79 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 105 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 84, 85 ch 61 SLA 2010; am § 8 ch 42 SLA 2014; am § 5 ch 114 SLA 2014; am § 14 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2018; am § 4 ch 65 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 2018; am § 156 ch 8 SLA 2022)